en: elderberry syrup
bg: сироп от бъз
da: hyldbærsirup
de: Holunderbeersirup
es: jarabe de sauco, sirope de sauco
fi: seljamarjasiirappi
fr: sirop de sureau
hr: sirup od bazge
it: sciroppo di sambuco
nl: vliersiroop
pl: syrop z czarnego bzu
sv: flädersirap

fr: concentré de sureau
de: Holunderbeerenkonzentrat
es: concentrato di coccole di sambuco
fi: seljanmarjatiiviste

en: elderflower, elderflowers
da: hyldeblomst
de: Holunderblüte, Holunderblüten
fi: seljankukka
fr: fleur de sureau, fleurs de sureau
ga: bláth troim
hr: cvijet bazge, Sambucus nigra L
it: fiori di sambuco, sambuco fiore
la: sambuci flos
nb: hylleblomst, hyllebærblomst
nl: vlierbloesem
nn: hylleblomster
sl: bezgov cvet
sv: fläderblom, blommor från fläderbusken
zh: 接骨木花

en: elderflower extract
de: Holunderblütenextrakt
es: extracto de flor del sauco, extracto de flor de sauco
fi: seljankukkauute
fr: Extraits de fleurs de sureau
hr: ekstrakt cvijeta bazge
it: Estratto di sanbuco
pl: ekstrakt z kwiatu czarnego bzu, ekstrakt z kwiatu bzu czarnego, ekstrakt kwiatu czarnego bzu, wyciąg z czarnego bzu
sv: fläderblomsextrakt, extrakt av blommor från fläderbusken

en: rowanberry, rowanberries
bg: калина
cs: jeřabin
da: rønnebær
de: Vogelbeeren
el: καρπούς σορβιάς
es: serbas
et: hariliku pihlaka
fi: pihlajanmarjaa
fr: sorbe, sorbes
hr: jarebiku
hu: madárberkenye
it: sorbe
la: sorbus aucaparia
lt: šermukšnių
lv: pīlādžogām
mt: ittut tas-sigra rowan
nl: lĳsterbessen
pl: owoców jarzębiny
pt: sorvas
ro: scorușelor
sk: jarabinu
sl: jerebike
sv: rönnbär, rönnbärs

en: fig, figs
an: Figo
bg: смокиня, смокини
br: Fiez
ca: figa
cs: fík, fíky
da: figen
de: Feigen
es: higo, higos
et: Viigimari
fi: viikuna
fr: figue
gl: Figo
hr: smokva, smokve
ia: fico
it: fico, fichi
ko: 무화과
la: Higo
lt: Figa
nl: vijg, vijgen
nn: fiken
pl: figa, figi, fig
ru: инжир
sk: Figa
sv: fikon
tr: incir

en: Pajarero Figs
es: higos pajarero
it: fichi Pajarero

en: cactus fig
de: Kaktusfeigen
es: higo chumbo
fi: kaktusviikuna
fr: figue de Barbarie
hr: kaktus smokva
it: Fico d'India
nl: cactusvijg

en: gooseberry, gooseberries
af: appelliefie
ar: عنب الثعلب
be: агрэ́ст
bg: цариградско грозде, бодливо грозде, крижовник
ca: agrassó
cs: srstka angrešt
cv: йĕплĕ хурлăхан
da: stikkelsbær
de: Stachelbeere, Stachelbeeren
eo: groso
es: grosella espinosa
et: karusmari
eu: arakatza
fa: انگورفرنگی، گالش انگور
fi: karviainen
fr: groseille à maquereaux, groseilles à maquereaux, groseille verte, groseilles vertes
fy: krúsbei
ga: spíonán
gl: groselleira verde
gv: berrish ghlass
he: חזרזר
hr: ogrozd
hu: egres
hy: Կոկռոշենի
io: grozelo
is: stikilsber
it: uva spina
ja: セイヨウスグリ
ka: ჩვეულებრივი ხურტკმელი
kk: қарлыған
kn: ಬೆಟ್ಟನೆಲ್ಲಿ
ko: 구즈베리
la: Ribes uva-crispa
lb: déck Kréischel
li: kroezjel
lt: agrastas
lv: ērkšķogas
ms: gusberi
nb: stikkelsbær
nl: kruisbes
nn: stikkelsbær
nv: kʼíníjíłʼahí
os: Хъалгъæн
pl: agrest, agrestu, agrestowy
pt: groselheira
ro: agrișul
ru: крыжовник
sd: گوُز بيري هي
se: muovjejieret
sh: ogrozd
sl: kosmúlja
sr: oгрозд
sv: krusbär
th: కేశ ఉసిరీ
tl: gansang-ratiles
tr: bektaşi üzümü
tt: катырган
uk: а́ґрус
vi: lý chua lông
zh: 鵝莓

en: gooseberry juice
de: Stachelbeersaft
fi: karviaismehu, karviaistäysmehu
sv: krusbärjuice

en: goji, goji berries
bg: годжи, годжи бери
ca: goji
cs: godži
de: Gemeiner Bocksdorn
el: γκότζι μπέρυ
es: Goji, bayas de goji
eu: hesilahar
fa: گوجی‌بری
fi: Goji-marja
fr: baies de goji, baie de goji
gl: Goxi
hr: goji
hu: Goji bogyó
it: goji
ko: 구기자
la: Lycium barbarum
pl: goji, jagoda goji, jagody goji
sk: Kou-čchi
sq: Goji
sv: Gojibär
te: గోజీ
vi: Củ khởi

en: dried goji berries
de: getrocknete Goji-Beeren
fi: kuivatut goji-marjat
fr: baies de goji séchées
hr: sušene goji bobice
it: bacche di goji essiccate

en: guava, guavas
af: koejawel
bg: гуава
cs: kvajáva, kvajávy
da: guavabær
de: Guaven
dv: ފޭރު
el: γουάβα, γκουαγιάβα
es: guayaba
et: guaava, guajaav
eu: guaiaba
fa: گواوا
fi: guava, hedelmäguava, guavat, hedelmäguavat
fr: goyave, goyaves
ga: guábha, guábha coiteann
gl: goiaba
gn: arasa
gu: જમરૂખ
ha: gweba
hr: guava
ht: gwayav
ia: guayaba
it: guaiave, guaiava, guava
jv: jambu wiji
ko: 구아바
kv: гуайява
la: psidium guajava
ln: lípéla
mg: goavy
mr: पेरु
my: မာလကာပင်
nl: guava
pl: gujawa, gruszla, guawa, gwajawa, gujawy
pt: goiaba
ru: гуайява
rw: amapera
sd: زيتون
si: පේර ශාකය
sk: goyave
sl: gvava
sr: guava
sv: guava
sw: pera
ta: கொய்யாப் பழம்
te: జామపండు
tl: bayabas
ty: tūava
ur: امرود
za: sandauz
zh: 番石榴果

en: kiwifruit, kiwi, kiwi fruit, Chinese gooseberry
af: kiwivrug
an: kiwi
ar: كيوي
az: kivi
be: ківі
bg: киви
bi: kiwe
bn: কিউই ফল
bo: སྤྲེལ་ཁམ།
br: kiwi
bs: kivi
ca: kiwi
cs: kiwi
cy: ffrwyth ciwi
da: kiwifrugt, kiwi
de: Kiwi, Kiwifrucht
el: ακτινίδιο
eo: kivifrukto
es: kiwi
et: kiivi
eu: kiwi
fa: کیوی
fi: kiivi
fr: kiwi
ga: cíobhaí, planda cíobhaíonna
gl: kiwi
he: קיווי
hi: कीवी फल
hr: kiwi, kiwana, aktinidija
ht: kiwi
hu: kivi
hy: կիվի
id: buah kiwi
is: kíví
it: kiwi, actinidia
ja: キウイフルーツ, キウイ, キウィー, キーウィー, キーウィ, キウィ
jv: kiwi
ka: კივი
kk: киви жемісі
kn: ಕೀವಿಹಣ್ಣು
ko: 참다래
ky: киви
la: actinidiae fructus
lb: Kiwi
lt: kivis, kivi
lv: kivi
mi: huakiwi
mk: киви
ml: കിവി പഴം
mr: किवी
ms: buah kiwi
my: ကီဝီသီး
nb: kiwi, kiwifrukt
ne: ठेकीफल
nl: kiwi
nn: kiwi, kiwifrukt
nv: chʼil dishooí
oc: kiwi
pa: ਕੀਵੀ
pl: kiwi, aktinidia
pt: quiuí
ro: kiwi
ru: киви
sh: kivi
sk: kivi
sl: kivi
sr: киви
su: buah kiwi
sv: kiwifrukt, kiwi
ta: பசலிப்பழம்
th: กีวี
ti: ኪዊ
tr: kivi
tt: киви
uk: ківі
ur: کيوی
uz: kivi
vi: quả dương đào
zh: 猕猴桃, 奇異果
zu: kiwifruit

en: Hayward kiwifruit
xx: Hayward
da: Hayward-kiwifrugt
ja: ヘイワード
la: actinidia chinensis var. deliciosa ‘Hayward’
sv: Hayward-kiwifrukt
zh: 海沃德

en: lingonberry, lingonberries, cowberry, cowberries, foxberry, foxberries, mountain xry, mountain cranberries, red whortleberry, red whortleberries
ca: nabius
da: tyttebær
de: Preiselbeere, Preiselbeeren
es: Arándanos agrios
et: pohl
fi: Puolukka
fr: airelle, airelles, airelle rouge, airelles rouges
it: mirtillo rosso, mirtilli rossi
la: Vaccinium vitis-idaea
lb: rout Molbier
lt: Bruknė
nb: tyttebær
nl: vossebes, rode bosbes
pl: borówka brusznica, borówka czerwona
ru: брусника
sv: lingon

en: wild lingonberry, wild lingonberries
de: Wild-Preiselbeere, Wild-Preiselbeeren, Wildpreiselbeere, Wildpreiselbeeren
fr: airelle sauvage, airelles sauvages

en: lingonberry juice
de: Preiselbeersaft
fi: puolukkamehu, puolukkatäysmehu
fr: jus d'airelle, jus d'airelles, jus d'airelle rouge, jus d'airelles rouges
hr: sok od brusnice
it: succo di mirtillo rosso
sv: lingonjuice

en: Lukuma
de: Lúcuma, Lucuma
it: lucuma

en: Lukuma powder
de: Lucuma-Pulver, lucumapulver
fr: lucuma en poudre
hr: lukuma u prahu
it: polvere di Lukuma
pl: sproszkowane owowce lucuma